Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-1507
Violations; penalty.

Any register of deeds who shall neglect to perform any of the duties described in section 23-1506 shall be guilty of a Class IV misdemeanor.

Laws 1893, c. 14, § 2, p. 147;

R.S.1913, § 5622;

C.S.1922, § 4949;

C.S.1929, § 26-1207;

R.S.1943, § 23-1507;

Laws 1977, LB 40, § 96.